Illinois, session 104th, HB2473.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Social 5Work Licensure Compact Act. 6    Section 5. Social Work Licensure Compact. The State of 7Illinois ratifies and approves the following Compact: 8SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT9    SECTION 1: PURPOSE10    The purpose of this Compact is to facilitate interstate 11practice of Regulated Social Workers by improving public 12access to competent Social Work Services. The Compact 13preserves the regulatory authority of States to protect public 14health and safety through the current system of State 15licensure.16    This Compact is designed to achieve the following 17objectives:18    A. Increase public access to Social Work Services;19    B. Reduce overly burdensome and duplicative requirements 20associated with holding multiple licenses;21    C. Enhance the Member States' ability to protect the 22public's health and safety;  HB2473- 2 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    D. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in 2regulating multistate practice;3    E. Promote mobility and address workforce shortages by 4eliminating the necessity for licenses in multiple States by 5providing for the mutual recognition of other Member State 6licenses;7    F. Support military families;8    G. Facilitate the exchange of licensure and disciplinary 9information among Member States;10    H. Authorize all Member States to hold a Regulated Social 11Worker accountable for abiding by a Member State's laws, 12regulations, and applicable professional standards in the 13Member State in which the client is located at the time care is 14rendered; and15    I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased 16access to regulated Social Work Services. 17    SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS18    As used in this Compact, and except as otherwise provided, 19the following definitions shall apply:20    A. "Active Military Member" means any individual with 21full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the United 22States including members of the National Guard and Reserve.23    B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, 24equitable or criminal action permitted by a State's laws which 25is imposed by a Licensing Authority or other authority against   HB2473- 3 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1a Regulated Social Worker, including actions against an 2individual's license or Multistate Authorization to Practice 3such as revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the 4Licensee, limitation on the Licensee's practice, or any other 5Encumbrance on licensure affecting a Regulated Social Worker's 6authorization to practice, including issuance of a cease and 7desist action.8    C. "Alternative Program" means a non-disciplinary 9monitoring or practice remediation process approved by a 10Licensing Authority to address practitioners with an 11Impairment.12    D. "Charter Member States" - Member States who have 13enacted legislation to adopt this Compact where such 14legislation predates the effective date of this Compact as 15described in Section 14.16    E. "Compact Commission" or "Commission" means the 17government agency whose membership consists of all States that 18have enacted this Compact, which is known as the Social Work 19Licensure Compact Commission, as described in Section 10, and 20which shall operate as an instrumentality of the Member 21States.22    F. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means:23        1. Investigative information that a Licensing 24    Authority, after a preliminary inquiry that includes 25    notification and an opportunity for the Regulated Social 26    Worker to respond has reason to believe is not groundless   HB2473- 4 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    and, if proved true, would indicate more than a minor 2    infraction as may be defined by the Commission; or3        2. Investigative information that indicates that the 4    Regulated Social Worker represents an immediate threat to 5    public health and safety, as may be defined by the 6    Commission, regardless of whether the Regulated Social 7    Worker has been notified and has had an opportunity to 8    respond.9    G. "Data System" means a repository of information about 10Licensees, including, continuing education, examination, 11licensure, Current Significant Investigative Information, 12Disqualifying Event, Multistate License(s) and Adverse Action 13information or other information as required by the 14Commission.15    H. "Disqualifying Event" means any Adverse Action or 16incident which results in an Encumbrance that disqualifies or 17makes the Licensee ineligible to either obtain, retain or 18renew a Multistate License.19    I. "Domicile" means the jurisdiction in which the Licensee 20resides and intends to remain indefinitely.21    J. "Encumbrance" means a revocation or suspension of, or 22any limitation on, the full and unrestricted practice of 23Social Work licensed and regulated by a Licensing Authority. 24    K. "Executive Committee" means a group of delegates 25elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers 26granted to them by, the compact and Commission.  HB2473- 5 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    L. "Home State" means the Member State that is the 2Licensee's primary Domicile.3    M. "Impairment" means a condition(s) that may impair a 4practitioner's ability to engage in full and unrestricted 5practice as a Regulated Social Worker without some type of 6intervention and may include alcohol and drug dependence, 7mental health impairment, and neurological or physical 8impairments.9    N. "Licensee(s)" means an individual who currently holds a 10license from a State to practice as a Regulated Social Worker.11    O. "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a 12Member State, or equivalent, that is responsible for the 13licensing and regulation of Regulated Social Workers.14    P. "Member State" means a state, commonwealth, district, 15or territory of the United States of America that has enacted 16this Compact.17    Q. "Multistate Authorization to Practice" means a legally 18authorized privilege to practice, which is equivalent to a 19license, associated with a Multistate License permitting the 20practice of Social Work in a Remote State.21    R. "Multistate License" means a license to practice as a 22Regulated Social Worker issued by a Home State Licensing 23Authority that authorizes the Regulated Social Worker to 24practice in all Member States under Multistate Authorization 25to Practice.26    S. "Qualifying National Exam" means a national licensing   HB2473- 6 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1examination approved by the Commission.2    T. "Regulated Social Worker" means any clinical, master's 3or bachelor's Social Worker licensed by a Member State 4regardless of the title used by that Member State.5    U. "Remote State" means a Member State other than the 6Licensee's Home State.7    V. "Rule(s)" or "Rule(s) of the Commission" means a 8regulation or regulations duly promulgated by the Commission, 9as authorized by the Compact, that has the force of law.10    W. "Single State License" means a Social Work license 11issued by any State that authorizes practice only within the 12issuing State and does not include Multistate Authorization to 13Practice in any Member State.14    X. "Social Work" or "Social Work Services" means the 15application of social work theory, knowledge, methods, ethics, 16and the professional use of self to restore or enhance social, 17psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals, 18couples, families, groups, organizations, and communities 19through the care and services provided by a Regulated Social 20Worker as set forth in the Member State's statutes and 21regulations in the State where the services are being 22provided.23    Y. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or 24territory of the United States of America that regulates the 25practice of Social Work.26    Z. "Unencumbered License" means a license that authorizes   HB2473- 7 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1a Regulated Social Worker to engage in the full and 2unrestricted practice of Social Work. 3    SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT4    A. To be eligible to participate in the compact, a 5potential Member State must currently meet all of the 6following criteria:7        1. License and regulate the practice of Social Work at 8    either the clinical, master's, or bachelor's category.9        2. Require applicants for licensure to graduate from a 10    program that is:11            a. Operated by a college or university recognized 12        by the Licensing Authority;13            b. Accredited, or in candidacy by an institution 14        that subsequently becomes accredited, by an 15        accrediting agency recognized by either:16                i. the Council for Higher Education 17            Accreditation, or its successor; or18                ii. the United States Department of Education; 19            and20            c. Corresponds to the licensure sought as outlined 21        in Section 4.22        3. Require applicants for clinical licensure to 23    complete a period of supervised practice.24        4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving, 25    investigating, and adjudicating complaints about   HB2473- 8 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Licensees.2    B. To maintain membership in the Compact a Member State 3shall:4        1. Require that applicants for a Multistate License 5    pass a Qualifying National Exam for the corresponding 6    category of Multistate License sought as outlined in 7    Section 4.8        2. Participate fully in the Commission's Data System, 9    including using the Commission's unique identifier as 10    defined in Rules;11        3. Notify the Commission, in compliance with the terms 12    of the Compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the 13    availability of Current Significant Investigative 14    Information regarding a Licensee; 15        4. Implement procedures for considering the criminal 16    history records of applicants for a Multistate License. 17    Such procedures shall include the submission of 18    fingerprints or other biometric-based information by 19    applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's 20    criminal history record information from the Federal 21    Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for 22    retaining that State's criminal records.23        5. Comply with the Rules of the Commission;24        6. Require an applicant to obtain or retain a license 25    in the Home State and meet the Home State's qualifications 26    for licensure or renewal of licensure, as well as all   HB2473- 9 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    other applicable Home State laws;2        7. Authorize a Licensee holding a Multistate License 3    in any Member State to practice in accordance with the 4    terms of the Compact and Rules of the Commission; and5        8. Designate a delegate to participate in the 6    Commission meetings.7    C. A Member State meeting the requirements of Section 3.A. 8and 3.B of this Compact shall designate the categories of 9Social Work licensure that are eligible for issuance of a 10Multistate License for applicants in such Member State. To the 11extent that any Member State does not meet the requirements 12for participation in the Compact at any particular category of 13Social Work licensure, such Member State may choose, but is 14not obligated to, issue a Multistate License to applicants 15that otherwise meet the requirements of Section 4 for issuance 16of a Multistate License in such category or categories of 17licensure.18    D. The Home State may charge a fee for granting the 19Multistate License. 20    SECTION 4. SOCIAL WORKER PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT21    A. To be eligible for a Multistate License under the terms 22and provisions of the Compact, an applicant, regardless of 23category must:24        1. Hold or be eligible for an active, Unencumbered 25    License in the Home State;  HB2473- 10 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        2. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, 2    for the Multistate License;3        3. Submit, in connection with an application for a 4    Multistate License, fingerprints or other biometric data 5    for the purpose of obtaining criminal history record 6    information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and 7    the agency responsible for retaining that State's criminal 8    records.9        4. Notify the Home State of any Adverse Action, 10    Encumbrance, or restriction on any professional license 11    taken by any Member State or non-Member State within 30 12    days from the date the action is taken. 13        5. Meet any continuing competence requirements 14    established by the Home State;15        6. Abide by the laws, regulations, and applicable 16    standards in the Member State where the client is located 17    at the time care is rendered.18    B. An applicant for a clinical-category Multistate License 19must meet all of the following requirements:20        1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be 21    satisfied by either:22            a. Passage of a clinical-category Qualifying 23        National Exam; or24            b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State 25        at the clinical category, beginning prior to such time 26        as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the Home   HB2473- 11 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        State and accompanied by a period of continuous Social 2        Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be further 3        governed by the Rules of the Commission; or4            c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing 5        competency requirements which the Commission may 6        determine by Rule.7        2. Attain at least a master's degree in Social Work 8    from a program that is:9            a. Operated by a college or university recognized 10        by the Licensing Authority; and11            b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently 12        becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 13        recognized by either:14                i. the Council for Higher Education 15            Accreditation or its successor; or16                ii. the United States Department of Education.17        3. Fulfill a practice requirement, which shall be 18    satisfied by demonstrating completion of either:19            a. A period of postgraduate supervised clinical 20        practice equal to a minimum of three thousand hours; 21        or22            b. A minimum of two years of full-time 23        postgraduate supervised clinical practice; or24            c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing 25        practice requirements which the Commission may 26        determine by Rule.  HB2473- 12 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    C. An applicant for a master's-category Multistate License 2must meet all of the following requirements:3        1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be 4    satisfied by either:5            a. Passage of a masters-category Qualifying 6        National Exam; 7            b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State 8        at the master's category, beginning prior to such time 9        as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the Home 10        State at the master's category and accompanied by a 11        continuous period of Social Work licensure thereafter, 12        all of which may be further governed by the Rules of 13        the Commission; or14            c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing 15        competency requirements which the Commission may 16        determine by Rule.17        2. Attain at least a master's degree in Social Work 18    from a program that is:19            a. Operated by a college or university recognized 20        by the Licensing Authority; and21            b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently 22        becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 23        recognized by either:24                i. the Council for Higher Education 25            Accreditation or its successor; or26                ii. the United States Department of Education.  HB2473- 13 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    D. An applicant for a bachelor's-category Multistate 2License must meet all of the following requirements:3        1. Fulfill a competency requirement, which shall be 4    satisfied by either:5            a. Passage of a bachelor's-category Qualifying 6        National Exam;7            b. Licensure of the applicant in their Home State 8        at the bachelor's category, beginning prior to such 9        time as a Qualifying National Exam was required by the 10        Home State and accompanied by a period of continuous 11        Social Work licensure thereafter, all of which may be 12        further governed by the Rules of the Commission; or13            c. The substantial equivalency of the foregoing 14        competency requirements which the Commission may 15        determine by Rule.16        2. Attain at least a bachelor's degree in Social Work 17    from a program that is:18            a. Operated by a college or university recognized 19        by the Licensing Authority; and20            b. Accredited, or in candidacy that subsequently 21        becomes accredited, by an accrediting agency 22        recognized by either:23                i. the Council for Higher Education 24            Accreditation or its successor; or25                ii. the United States Department of Education. 26    E. The Multistate License for a Regulated Social Worker is   HB2473- 14 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1subject to the renewal requirements of the Home State. The 2Regulated Social Worker must maintain compliance with the 3requirements of Section 4(A) to be eligible to renew a 4Multistate License.5    F. The Regulated Social Worker's services in a Remote 6State are subject to that Member State's regulatory authority. 7A Remote State may, in accordance with due process and that 8Member State's laws, remove a Regulated Social Worker's 9Multistate Authorization to Practice in the Remote State for a 10specific period of time, impose fines, and take any other 11necessary actions to protect the health and safety of its 12citizens.13    G. If a Multistate License is encumbered, the Regulated 14Social Worker's Multistate Authorization to Practice shall be 15deactivated in all Remote States until the Multistate License 16is no longer encumbered.17    H. If a Multistate Authorization to Practice is encumbered 18in a Remote State, the regulated Social Worker's Multistate 19Authorization to Practice may be deactivated in that State 20until the Multistate Authorization to Practice is no longer 21encumbered. 22    SECTION 5: ISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE23    A. Upon receipt of an application for Multistate License, 24the Home State Licensing Authority shall determine the 25applicant's eligibility for a Multistate License in accordance   HB2473- 15 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1with Section 4 of this Compact.2    B. If such applicant is eligible pursuant to Section 4 of 3this Compact, the Home State Licensing Authority shall issue a 4Multistate License that authorizes the applicant or Regulated 5Social Worker to practice in all Member States under a 6Multistate Authorization to Practice.7    C. Upon issuance of a Multistate License, the Home State 8Licensing Authority shall designate whether the Regulated 9Social Worker holds a Multistate License in the Bachelors, 10Masters, or Clinical category of Social Work.11    D. A Multistate License issued by a Home State to a 12resident in that State shall be recognized by all Compact 13Member States as authorizing Social Work Practice under a 14Multistate Authorization to Practice corresponding to each 15category of licensure regulated in each Member State. 16    SECTION 6: AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE COMPACT COMMISSION AND 17MEMBER STATE LICENSING AUTHORITIES18    A. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 19Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 20way reduce the ability of a Member State to enact and enforce 21laws, regulations, or other rules related to the practice of 22Social Work in that State, where those laws, regulations, or 23other rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this 24Compact. 25    B. Nothing in this Compact shall affect the requirements   HB2473- 16 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1established by a Member State for the issuance of a Single 2State License.3    C. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 4Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 5way reduce the ability of a Member State to take Adverse Action 6against a Licensee's Single State License to practice Social 7Work in that State.8    D. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 9Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 10way reduce the ability of a Remote State to take Adverse Action 11against a Licensee's Multistate Authorization to Practice in 12that State.13    E. Nothing in this Compact, nor any Rule of the 14Commission, shall be construed to limit, restrict, or in any 15way reduce the ability of a Licensee's Home State to take 16Adverse Action against a Licensee's Multistate License based 17upon information provided by a Remote State. 18    SECTION 7: REISSUANCE OF A MULTISTATE LICENSE BY A NEW 19HOME STATE20    A. A Licensee can hold a Multistate License, issued by 21their Home State, in only one Member State at any given time.22    B. If a Licensee changes their Home State by moving 23between two Member States:24        1. The Licensee shall immediately apply for the 25    reissuance of their Multistate License in their new Home   HB2473- 17 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    State. The Licensee shall pay all applicable fees and 2    notify the prior Home State in accordance with the Rules 3    of the Commission.4        2. Upon receipt of an application to reissue a 5    Multistate License, the new Home State shall verify that 6    the Multistate License is active, unencumbered and 7    eligible for reissuance under the terms of the Compact and 8    the Rules of the Commission. The Multistate License issued 9    by the prior Home State will be deactivated and all Member 10    States notified in accordance with the applicable Rules 11    adopted by the Commission.12        3. Prior to the reissuance of the Multistate License, 13    the new Home State shall conduct procedures for 14    considering the criminal history records of the Licensee. 15    Such procedures shall include the submission of 16    fingerprints or other biometric-based information by 17    applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's 18    criminal history record information from the Federal 19    Bureau of Investigation and the agency responsible for 20    retaining that State's criminal records.21        4. If required for initial licensure, the new Home 22    State may require completion of jurisprudence requirements 23    in the new Home State.24        5. Notwithstanding any other provision of this 25    Compact, if a Licensee does not meet the requirements set 26    forth in this Compact for the reissuance of a Multistate   HB2473- 18 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    License by the new Home State, then the Licensee shall be 2    subject to the new Home State requirements for the 3    issuance of a Single State License in that State.4    C. If a Licensee changes their primary State of residence 5by moving from a Member State to a non-Member State, or from a 6non-Member State to a Member State, then the Licensee shall be 7subject to the State requirements for the issuance of a Single 8State License in the new Home State.9    D. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with a 10Licensee's ability to hold a Single State License in multiple 11States; however, for the purposes of this Compact, a Licensee 12shall have only one Home State, and only one Multistate 13License.14    E. Nothing in this Compact shall interfere with the 15requirements established by a Member State for the issuance of 16a Single State License. 17    SECTION 8. MILITARY FAMILIES18    An Active Military Member or their spouse shall designate 19a Home State where the individual has a Multistate License. 20The individual may retain their Home State designation during 21the period the service member is on active duty. 22    SECTION 9. ADVERSE ACTIONS23    A. In addition to the other powers conferred by State law, 24a Remote State shall have the authority, in accordance with   HB2473- 19 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1existing State due process law, to:2        1. Take Adverse Action against a Regulated Social 3    Worker's Multistate Authorization to Practice only within 4    that Member State, and issue subpoenas for both hearings 5    and investigations that require the attendance and 6    testimony of witnesses as well as the production of 7    evidence. Subpoenas issued by a Licensing Authority in a 8    Member State for the attendance and testimony of witnesses 9    or the production of evidence from another Member State 10    shall be enforced in the latter State by any court of 11    competent jurisdiction, according to the practice and 12    procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas issued in 13    proceedings pending before it. The issuing Licensing 14    Authority shall pay any witness fees, travel expenses, 15    mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes 16    of the State in which the witnesses or evidence are 17    located.18        2. Only the Home State shall have the power to take 19    Adverse Action against a Regulated Social Worker's 20    Multistate License.21    B. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, the Home State 22shall give the same priority and effect to reported conduct 23received from a Member State as it would if the conduct had 24occurred within the Home State. In so doing, the Home State 25shall apply its own State laws to determine appropriate 26action.  HB2473- 20 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    C. The Home State shall complete any pending 2investigations of a Regulated Social Worker who changes their 3Home State during the course of the investigations. The Home 4State shall also have the authority to take appropriate 5action(s) and shall promptly report the conclusions of the 6investigations to the administrator of the Data System. The 7administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the new 8Home State of any Adverse Actions.9    D. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, 10may recover from the affected Regulated Social Worker the 11costs of investigations and dispositions of cases resulting 12from any Adverse Action taken against that Regulated Social 13Worker.14    E. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on the 15factual findings of another Member State, provided that the 16Member State follows its own procedures for taking the Adverse 17Action.18    F. Joint Investigations:19        1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member 20    State by its respective Social Work practice act or other 21    applicable State law, any Member State may participate 22    with other Member States in joint investigations of 23    Licensees.24        2. Member States shall share any investigative, 25    litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any 26    joint or individual investigation initiated under the   HB2473- 21 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Compact.2    G. If Adverse Action is taken by the Home State against the 3Multistate License of a Regulated Social Worker, the Regulated 4Social Worker's Multistate Authorization to Practice in all 5other Member States shall be deactivated until all 6Encumbrances have been removed from the Multistate License. 7All Home State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action 8against the license of a Regulated Social Worker shall include 9a statement that the Regulated Social Worker's Multistate 10Authorization to Practice is deactivated in all Member States 11until all conditions of the decision, order or agreement are 12satisfied.13    H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall 14promptly notify the administrator of the Data System. The 15administrator of the Data System shall promptly notify the 16Home State and all other Member State's of any Adverse Actions 17by Remote States.18    I. Nothing in this Compact shall override a Member State's 19decision that participation in an Alternative Program may be 20used in lieu of Adverse Action.21    J. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State 22to demand the issuance of subpoenas for attendance and 23testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from 24another Member State for lawful actions within that Member 25State.26    K. Nothing in this Compact shall authorize a Member State   HB2473- 22 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1to impose discipline against a Regulated Social Worker who 2holds a Multistate Authorization to Practice for lawful 3actions within another Member State.  4    SECTION 10. ESTABLISHMENT OF SOCIAL WORK LICENSURE COMPACT 5COMMISSION6    A. The Compact Member States hereby create and establish a 7joint government agency whose membership consists of all 8Member States that have enacted the compact known as the 9Social Work Licensure Compact Commission. The Commission is an 10instrumentality of the Compact States acting jointly and not 11an instrumentality of any one State. The Commission shall come 12into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as 13set forth in Section 14.14    B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings15        1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one 16    (1) delegate selected by that Member State's State 17    Licensing Authority.18        2. The delegate shall be either:19            a. A current member of the State Licensing 20        Authority at the time of appointment, who is a 21        Regulated Social Worker or public member of the State 22        Licensing Authority; or23            b. An administrator of the State Licensing 24        Authority or their designee.25        3. The Commission shall by Rule or bylaw establish a   HB2473- 23 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    term of office for delegates and may by Rule or bylaw 2    establish term limits.3        4. The Commission may recommend removal or suspension 4    any delegate from office.5        5. A Member State's State Licensing Authority shall 6    fill any vacancy of its delegate occurring on the 7    Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.8        6. Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all 9    matters before the Commission requiring a vote by 10    Commission delegates.11        7. A delegate shall vote in person or by such other 12    means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide 13    for delegates to meet by telecommunication, 14    videoconference, or other means of communication.15        8. The Commission shall meet at least once during each 16    calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set 17    forth in the bylaws. The Commission may meet by 18    telecommunication, video conference or other similar 19    electronic means.20    C. The Commission shall have the following powers:21        1. Establish the fiscal year of the Commission;22        2. Establish code of conduct and conflict of interest 23    policies;24        3. Establish and amend Rules and bylaws; 25        4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with 26    the bylaws;  HB2473- 24 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        5. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with 2    the provisions of this Compact, the Commission's Rules, 3    and the bylaws;4        6. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions 5    in the name of the Commission, provided that the standing 6    of any State Licensing Board to sue or be sued under 7    applicable law shall not be affected;8        7. Maintain and certify records and information 9    provided to a Member State as the authenticated business 10    records of the Commission, and designate an agent to do so 11    on the Commission's behalf;12        8. Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;13        9. Borrow, accept, or contract for services of 14    personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a 15    Member State;16        10. Conduct an annual financial review;17        11. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix 18    compensation, define duties, grant such individuals 19    appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the 20    Compact, and establish the Commission's personnel policies 21    and programs relating to conflicts of interest, 22    qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel 23    matters;24        12. Assess and collect fees;25        13. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, 26    grants of money, other sources of revenue, equipment,   HB2473- 25 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, 2    and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the 3    Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or 4    conflict of interest;5        14. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or 6    use any property, real, personal, or mixed, or any 7    undivided interest therein;8        15. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, 9    abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, 10    personal, or mixed;11        16. Establish a budget and make expenditures;12        17. Borrow money;13        18. Appoint committees, including standing committees, 14    composed of members, State regulators, State legislators 15    or their representatives, and consumer representatives, 16    and such other interested persons as may be designated in 17    this Compact and the bylaws;18        19. Provide and receive information from, and 19    cooperate with, law enforcement agencies; 20        20. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, 21    including a chair and a vice chair;22        21. Determine whether a State's adopted language is 23    materially different from the model compact language such 24    that the State would not qualify for participation in the 25    Compact; and26        22. Perform such other functions as may be necessary   HB2473- 26 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this Compact.2    D. The Executive Committee3        1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act 4    on behalf of the Commission according to the terms of this 5    Compact. The powers, duties, and responsibilities of the 6    Executive Committee shall include:7            a. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the 8        administration of the compact including enforcement 9        and compliance with the provisions of the compact, its 10        Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed 11        necessary;12            b. Recommend to the Commission changes to the 13        Rules or bylaws, changes to this Compact legislation, 14        fees charged to Compact Member States, fees charged to 15        Licensees, and other fees;16            c. Ensure Compact administration services are 17        appropriately provided, including by contract;18            d. Prepare and recommend the budget;19            e. Maintain financial records on behalf of the 20        Commission;21            f. Monitor Compact compliance of Member States and 22        provide compliance reports to the Commission;23            g. Establish additional committees as necessary;24            h. Exercise the powers and duties of the 25        Commission during the interim between Commission 26        meetings, except for adopting or amending Rules,   HB2473- 27 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other 2        powers and duties expressly reserved to the Commission 3        by Rule or bylaw; and4            i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws 5        of the Commission.6        2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of up to 7    eleven (11) members:8            a. The chair and vice chair of the Commission 9        shall be voting members of the Executive Committee.10            b. The Commission shall elect five voting members 11        from the current membership of the Commission.12            c. Up to four (4) ex-officio, nonvoting members 13        from four (4) recognized national Social Work 14        organizations.15            d. The ex-officio members will be selected by 16        their respective organizations.17        3. The Commission may remove any member of the 18    Executive Committee as provided in the Commission's 19    bylaws.20        4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least 21    annually.22            a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to 23        the public, except that the Executive Committee may 24        meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in 25        subsection F.2 below.26            b. The Executive Committee shall give seven (7)   HB2473- 28 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        days' notice of its meetings, posted on its website 2        and as determined to provide notice to persons with an 3        interest in the business of the Commission.4            c. The Executive Committee may hold a special 5        meeting in accordance with subsection F.1.b. below.6    E. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member 7States an annual report.8    F. Meetings of the Commission9        1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except 10    that the Commission may meet in a closed, non-public 11    meeting as provided in subsection F.2 below.12            a. Public notice for all meetings of the full 13        Commission of meetings shall be given in the same 14        manner as required under the Rulemaking provisions in 15        Section 12, except that the Commission may hold a 16        special meeting as provided in subsection F.1.b below.17            b. The Commission may hold a special meeting when 18        it must meet to conduct emergency business by giving 19        48 hours' notice to all commissioners, on the 20        Commission's website, and other means as provided in 21        the Commission's Rules. The Commission's legal counsel 22        shall certify that the Commission's need to meet 23        qualifies as an emergency.24        2. The Commission or the Executive Committee or other 25    committees of the Commission may convene in a closed, 26    non-public meeting for the Commission or Executive   HB2473- 29 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Committee or other committees of the Commission to receive 2    legal advice or to discuss: 3            a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its 4        obligations under the Compact;5            b. The employment, compensation, discipline or 6        other matters, practices or procedures related to 7        specific employees;8            c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee 9        by the Commission or by a Member State's Licensing 10        Authority;11            d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated 12        litigation;13            e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, 14        lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate;15            f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally 16        censuring any person;17            g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial 18        information that is privileged or confidential;19            h. Information of a personal nature where 20        disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted 21        invasion of personal privacy;22            i. Investigative records compiled for law 23        enforcement purposes;24            j. Information related to any investigative 25        reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the 26        Commission or other committee charged with   HB2473- 30 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        responsibility of investigation or determination of 2        compliance issues pursuant to the Compact;3            k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure 4        by federal or Member State law; or5            l. Other matters as promulgated by the Commission 6        by Rule.7        3. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, 8    the presiding officer shall state that the meeting will be 9    closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, 10    and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.11        4. The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and 12    clearly describe all matters discussed in a meeting and 13    shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions 14    taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description 15    of the views expressed. All documents considered in 16    connection with an action shall be identified in such 17    minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting 18    shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a 19    majority vote of the Commission or order of a court of 20    competent jurisdiction.21    G. Financing of the Commission 22        1. The Commission shall pay, or provide for the 23    payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, 24    organization, and ongoing activities.25        2. The Commission may accept any and all appropriate 26    revenue sources as provided in subsection C(13).  HB2473- 31 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        3. The Commission may levy on and collect an annual 2    assessment from each Member State and impose fees on 3    Licensees of Member States to whom it grants a Multistate 4    License to cover the cost of the operations and activities 5    of the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total 6    amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as approved 7    each year for which revenue is not provided by other 8    sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member 9    States shall be allocated based upon a formula that the 10    Commission shall promulgate by Rule.11        4. The Commission shall not incur obligations of any 12    kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the 13    same; nor shall the Commission pledge the credit of any of 14    the Member States, except by and with the authority of the 15    Member State.16        5. The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all 17    receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements 18    of the Commission shall be subject to the financial review 19    and accounting procedures established under its bylaws. 20    However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled 21    by the Commission shall be subject to an annual financial 22    review by a certified or licensed public accountant, and 23    the report of the financial review shall be included in 24    and become part of the annual report of the Commission.25    H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification26        1. The members, officers, executive director,   HB2473- 32 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    employees and representatives of the Commission shall be 2    immune from suit and liability, both personally and in 3    their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or 4    loss of property or personal injury or other civil 5    liability caused by or arising out of any actual or 6    alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the 7    person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable 8    basis for believing occurred within the scope of 9    Commission employment, duties or responsibilities; 10    provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed 11    to protect any such person from suit or liability for any 12    damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the 13    intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that 14    person. The procurement of insurance of any type by the 15    Commission shall not in any way compromise or limit the 16    immunity granted hereunder.17        2. The Commission shall defend any member, officer, 18    executive director, employee, and representative of the 19    Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability 20    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 21    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 22    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or as determined 23    by the Commission that the person against whom the claim 24    is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 25    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or 26    responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be   HB2473- 33 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    construed to prohibit that person from retaining their own 2    counsel at their own expense; and provided further, that 3    the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not 4    result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton 5    misconduct.6        3. The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless 7    any member, officer, executive director, employee, and 8    representative of the Commission for the amount of any 9    settlement or judgment obtained against that person 10    arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or 11    omission that occurred within the scope of Commission 12    employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such 13    person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred 14    within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or 15    responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, 16    error, or omission did not result from the intentional or 17    willful or wanton misconduct of that person.18        4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation 19    on the liability of any Licensee for professional 20    malpractice or misconduct, which shall be governed solely 21    by any other applicable State laws.22        5. Nothing in this Compact shall be interpreted to 23    waive or otherwise abrogate a Member State's state action 24    immunity or state action affirmative defense with respect 25    to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or 26    any other State or federal antitrust or anticompetitive   HB2473- 34 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    law or regulation.2        6. Nothing in this Compact shall be construed to be a 3    waiver of sovereign immunity by the Member States or by 4    the Commission. 5    SECTION 11. DATA SYSTEM6    A. The Commission shall provide for the development, 7maintenance, operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data 8System.9    B. The Commission shall assign each applicant for a 10Multistate License a unique identifier, as determined by the 11Rules of the Commission.12    C. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the 13contrary, a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the 14Data System on all individuals to whom this Compact is 15applicable as required by the Rules of the Commission, 16including:17        1. Identifying information;18        2. Licensure data; 19        3. Adverse Actions against a license and information 20    related thereto;21        4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative 22    Program participation, the beginning and ending dates of 23    such participation, and other information related to such 24    participation not made confidential under Member State 25    law;  HB2473- 35 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        5. Any denial of application for licensure, and the 2    reason(s) for such denial;3        6. The presence of Current Significant Investigative 4    Information; and5        7. Other information that may facilitate the 6    administration of this Compact or the protection of the 7    public, as determined by the Rules of the Commission.8    D. The records and information provided to a Member State 9pursuant to this Compact or through the Data System, when 10certified by the Commission or an agent thereof, shall 11constitute the authenticated business records of the 12Commission, and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay 13exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial or 14administrative proceedings in a Member State.15    E. Current Significant Investigative Information 16pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State will only be 17available to other Member States.18        1. It is the responsibility of the Member States to 19    report any Adverse Action against a Licensee and to 20    monitor the database to determine whether Adverse Action 21    has been taken against a Licensee. Adverse Action 22    information pertaining to a Licensee in any Member State 23    will be available to any other Member State.24    F. Member States contributing information to the Data 25System may designate information that may not be shared with 26the public without the express permission of the contributing   HB2473- 36 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1State.2    G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is 3subsequently expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of 4the Member State contributing the information shall be removed 5from the Data System. 6    SECTION 12. RULEMAKING7    A. The Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in 8order to effectively and efficiently implement and administer 9the purposes and provisions of the Compact. A Rule shall be 10invalid and have no force or effect only if a court of 11competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is invalid because 12the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner 13that is beyond the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the 14powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable 15standard of review.16    B. The Rules of the Commission shall have the force of law 17in each Member State, provided however that where the Rules of 18the Commission conflict with the laws of the Member State that 19establish the Member State's laws, regulations, and applicable 20standards that govern the practice of Social Work as held by a 21court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Commission 22shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the 23conflict.24    C. The Commission shall exercise its Rulemaking powers 25pursuant to the criteria set forth in this Section and the   HB2473- 37 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1Rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall become binding on the 2day following adoption or the date specified in the rule or 3amendment, whichever is later.4    D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States 5rejects a Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute 6or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the Compact 7within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the Rule, then 8such Rule shall have no further force and effect in any Member 9State.10    E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting 11of the Commission.12    F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Commission 13shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral 14and written comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments.15    G. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule by the Commission, 16and at least thirty (30) days in advance of the meeting at 17which the Commission will hold a public hearing on the 18proposed Rule, the Commission shall provide a Notice of 19Proposed Rulemaking:20            1. On the website of the Commission or other 21        publicly accessible platform;22            2. To persons who have requested notice of the 23        Commission's notices of proposed rulemaking, and24            3. In such other way(s) as the Commission may by 25        Rule specify.26    H. The Notice of Proposed Rulemaking shall include:  HB2473- 38 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing 2    at which the Commission will hear public comments on the 3    proposed Rule and, if different, the time, date, and 4    location of the meeting where the Commission will consider 5    and vote on the proposed Rule;6        2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video 7    conference, or other electronic means, the Commission 8    shall include the mechanism for access to the hearing in 9    the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking;10        3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason 11    therefor;12        4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from 13    any interested person; and14        5. The manner in which interested persons may submit 15    written comments. 16    I. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording 17and all written comments and documents received by the 18Commission in response to the proposed Rule shall be available 19to the public.20    J. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring 21a separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the 22convenience of the Commission at hearings required by this 23section.24    K. The Commission shall, by majority vote of all members, 25take final action on the proposed Rule based on the Rulemaking 26record and the full text of the Rule.  HB2473- 39 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        1. The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed 2    Rule provided the changes do not enlarge the original 3    purpose of the proposed Rule.4        2. The Commission shall provide an explanation of the 5    reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule 6    as well as reasons for substantive changes not made that 7    were recommended by commenters.8        3. The Commission shall determine a reasonable 9    effective date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as 10    provided in Section 12.L, the effective date of the rule 11    shall be no sooner than 30 days after issuing the notice 12    that it adopted or amended the Rule.13    L. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the 14Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with 48 15hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the 16usual Rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in 17this section shall be retroactively applied to the Rule as 18soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety 19(90) days after the effective date of the Rule. For the 20purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must 21be adopted immediately in order to:22        1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, 23    or welfare;24        2. Prevent a loss of Commission or Member State funds;25        3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that 26    is established by federal law or rule; or  HB2473- 40 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        4. Protect public health and safety.2    M. The Commission or an authorized committee of the 3Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule 4for purposes of correcting typographical errors, errors in 5format, errors in consistency, or grammatical errors. Public 6notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the 7Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any 8person for a period of thirty (30) days after posting. The 9revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision 10results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be 11made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the 12end of the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision 13will take effect without further action. If the revision is 14challenged, the revision may not take effect without the 15approval of the Commission.16    N. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply 17under this compact. 18    SECTION 13. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT19    A. Oversight20        1. The executive and judicial branches of State 21    government in each Member State shall enforce this Compact 22    and take all actions necessary and appropriate to 23    implement the Compact.24        2. Except as otherwise provided in this Compact, venue 25    is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the   HB2473- 41 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a 2    court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office 3    of the Commission is located. The Commission may waive 4    venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts 5    or consents to participate in alternative dispute 6    resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or 7    limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action 8    against a Licensee for professional malpractice, 9    misconduct or any such similar matter.10        3. The Commission shall be entitled to receive service 11    of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or 12    interpretation of the Compact and shall have standing to 13    intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure 14    to provide the Commission service of process shall render 15    a judgment or order void as to the Commission, this 16    Compact, or promulgated Rules.17    B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination18        1. If the Commission determines that a Member State 19    has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or 20    responsibilities under this Compact or the promulgated 21    Rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the 22    defaulting State. The notice of default shall describe the 23    default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any 24    other action that the Commission may take, and shall offer 25    training and specific technical assistance regarding the 26    default.  HB2473- 42 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1        2. The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice 2    of default to the other Member States.3    C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the 4defaulting State may be terminated from the Compact upon an 5affirmative vote of a majority of the delegates of the Member 6States, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on 7that State by this Compact may be terminated on the effective 8date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the 9offending State of obligations or liabilities incurred during 10the period of default. 11    D. Termination of membership in the Compact shall be 12imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have 13been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall 14be given by the Commission to the governor, the majority and 15minority leaders of the defaulting State's legislature, the 16defaulting State's State Licensing Authority and each of the 17Member States' State Licensing Authority.18    E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all 19assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the 20effective date of termination, including obligations that 21extend beyond the effective date of termination.22    F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this 23Compact, that State shall immediately provide notice to all 24Licensees within that State of such termination. The 25terminated State shall continue to recognize all licenses 26granted pursuant to this Compact for a minimum of six (6)   HB2473- 43 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1months after the date of said notice of termination.2    G. The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a 3State that is found to be in default or that has been 4terminated from the Compact, unless agreed upon in writing 5between the Commission and the defaulting State.6    H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the 7Commission by petitioning the8    U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the 9federal district where the Commission has its principal 10offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of 11such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.12    I. Dispute Resolution13        1. Upon request by a Member State, the Commission 14    shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the Compact 15    that arise among Member States and between Member and 16    non-Member States.17        2. The Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing 18    for both mediation and binding dispute resolution for 19    disputes as appropriate.20    J. Enforcement21        1. By majority vote as provided by Rule, the 22    Commission may initiate legal action against a Member 23    State in default in the United States District Court for 24    the District of Columbia or the federal district where the 25    Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance 26    with the provisions of the Compact and its promulgated   HB2473- 44 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Rules. The relief sought may include both injunctive 2    relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is 3    necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs 4    of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. 5    The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of 6    the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other 7    remedies available under federal or the defaulting Member 8    State's law. 9        2. A Member State may initiate legal action against 10    the Commission in the U.S. District Court for the District 11    of Columbia or the federal district where the Commission 12    has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the 13    provisions of the Compact and its promulgated Rules. The 14    relief sought may include both injunctive relief and 15    damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, 16    the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such 17    litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.18        3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce 19    this compact against the Commission. 20    SECTION 14. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT21    A. The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which 22the Compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member 23State.24        1. On or after the effective date of the Compact, the 25    Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each   HB2473- 45 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    of the first seven Member States ("Charter Member States") 2    to determine if the statute enacted by each such Charter 3    Member State is materially different than the model 4    Compact statute.5            a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found 6        to be materially different from the model Compact 7        statute shall be entitled to the default process set 8        forth in Section 13.9            b. If any Member State is later found to be in 10        default, or is terminated or withdraws from the 11        Compact, the Commission shall remain in existence and 12        the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number 13        of Member States should be less than seven.14        2. Member States enacting the Compact subsequent to 15    the seven initial Charter Member States shall be subject 16    to the process set forth in Section 10(C)(21) to determine 17    if their enactments are materially different from the 18    model Compact statute and whether they qualify for 19    participation in the Compact.20        3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission 21    or in furtherance of the purposes of the administration of 22    the Compact prior to the effective date of the Compact or 23    the Commission coming into existence shall be considered 24    to be actions of the Commission unless specifically 25    repudiated by the Commission.26        4. Any State that joins the Compact subsequent to the   HB2473- 46 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1    Commission's initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws 2    shall be subject to the Rules and bylaws as they exist on 3    the date on which the Compact becomes law in that State. 4    Any Rule that has been previously adopted by the 5    Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on 6    the day the Compact becomes law in that State.7    B. Any Member State may withdraw from this Compact by 8enacting a statute repealing the same.9        1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect 10    until 180 days after enactment of the repealing statute.11        2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing 12    requirement of the withdrawing State's Licensing Authority 13    to comply with the investigative and Adverse Action 14    reporting requirements of this Compact prior to the 15    effective date of withdrawal.16        3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from 17    this compact, a State shall immediately provide notice of 18    such withdrawal to all Licensees within that State. 19    Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the 20    contrary, such withdrawing State shall continue to 21    recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact 22    for a minimum of 180 days after the date of such notice of 23    withdrawal.24    C. Nothing contained in this Compact shall be construed to 25invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other 26cooperative arrangement between a Member State and a   HB2473- 47 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1non-Member State that does not conflict with the provisions of 2this Compact.3    D. This Compact may be amended by the Member States. No 4amendment to this Compact shall become effective and binding 5upon any Member State until it is enacted into the laws of all 6Member States. 7    SECTION 15. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY8    A. This Compact and the Commission's rulemaking authority 9shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, 10and the implementation and administration of the Compact. 11Provisions of the Compact expressly authorizing or requiring 12the promulgation of Rules shall not be construed to limit the 13Commission's rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.14    B. The provisions of this Compact shall be severable and 15if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this Compact 16is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to 17the constitution of any Member State, a State seeking 18participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the 19applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or 20circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of 21competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this 22Compact and the applicability thereof to any other government, 23agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.24    C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, the 25Commission may deny a State's participation in the Compact or,   HB2473- 48 -LRB104 09801 BDA 19867 b1in accordance with the requirements of Section 13.B, terminate 2a Member State's participation in the Compact, if it 3determines that a constitutional requirement of a Member State 4is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this 5Compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any 6Member State, the Compact shall remain in full force and 7effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and 8effect as to the Member State affected as to all severable 9matters. 10    SECTION 16. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER 11STATE LAWS12    A. A Licensee providing services in a Remote State under a 13Multistate Authorization to Practice shall adhere to the laws 14and regulations, including laws, regulations, and applicable 15standards, of the Remote State where the client is located at 16the time care is rendered.17    B. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement 18of any other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent 19with the Compact.20    C. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal 21requirements in a Member State in conflict with the Compact 22are superseded to the extent of the conflict.23    D. All permissible agreements between the Commission and 24the Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.